California, session 20252026, AB1652.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11000.3 is added to the Government Code, to read:11000.3. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), an elective or appointive officer of a state agency acting in their official capacity shall not enter into, or request that another individual enter into, a nondisclosure agreement relating to the drafting, negotiation, or discussion of a proposed regulation or legislation.(b) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), any nondisclosure agreement relating to the drafting, negotiation, or discussion of a proposed regulation or legislation entered into or requested by an elective or appointive officer of a state agency acting in their official capacity after the effective date of this section shall be void and unenforceable.(c) (1) This section does not prohibit an elective or appointive officer of a state agency from entering into or requesting a nondisclosure agreement that prevents only the disclosure of trade secrets, private financial information, or proprietary information.(2) This section does not make void and unenforceable a nondisclosure agreement, or portion of a nondisclosure agreement, that prevents only the disclosure of trade secrets, private financial information, or proprietary information.(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Discussion” means direct or indirect communications engaged in by individuals for the purpose of reaching a decision regarding a proposed regulation or legislation.(2) “Drafting” means developing language for a proposed regulation or legislation pursuant to this chapter.(3) “Negotiation” means any form of direct or indirect communication whereby individuals who have opposing interests discuss the form of any proposed regulation or legislation that may resolve a dispute involving those interests.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading–Line 2___________________